Utah statutes.
19-6-109.   Inspections authorized.

Any duly authorized officer, employee, or representative of the director may, at any reasonable time and upon presentation of appropriate credentials, enter upon and inspect any property, premise, or place on or at which solid or hazardous wastes are generated, transported, stored, treated, or disposed of, and have access to and the right to copy any records relating to the wastes, for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with this part and the rules of the board.  Those persons referred to in this section may also inspect any waste and obtain waste samples, including samples from any vehicle in which wastes are being transported or samples of any containers or labels.  Any person obtaining samples shall give to the owner, operator, or agent a receipt describing the sample obtained and, if requested, a portion of each sample of waste equal in volume or weight to the portion retained.  If any analysis is made of those samples, a copy of the results of that analysis shall be furnished promptly to the owner, operator, or agent in charge.

